Hawaii statutes.
[§659-2] Against corporations, by attorney
general. It may also be granted upon the application of the attorney
general against individuals acting as a corporation without being legally
incorporated. [L 1876, c 39, §37; RL 1925, §2717; RL 1935, §4259; RL 1945,
§10280; RL 1955, §236-20; HRS §659-47; am L 1972, c 90, §3(b); ren HRS §659-2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next